Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.300

Division of elections—Director.

The secretary of state shall establish a division of elections within the office of the secretary of state and under the secretary's supervision. The division shall be under the immediate supervision of a director of elections who shall be appointed by the secretary of state and serve at the secretary's pleasure.

[ 1992 c 163 s 1.]